Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.265

Construction accounts—Exception to certain accounting requirements.

In order to comply with the provisions of the federal tax reform act of 1986, construction accounts that receive bond proceeds are exempt from RCW 43.88.050, 43.88.110, and 43.88.260 and may incur seasonal cash deficits pending the sale of bonds or bond anticipation notes subject to the following conditions:

(1) The respective account has unexpended appropriation authority.

(2) There are authorized unissued bonds available for sale by the state finance committee under direction to deposit the proceeds of the sale in the respective account.

(3) The bonds are of an amount that would remedy the cash deficit if the bonds were sold.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 14 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1989 1st ex.s. c 14: See RCW 43.99H.901.